District of Columbia statutes.
42-2022

Sharing of reconstruction cost where project not insured or insurance indemnity insufficient.

Where the project is not insured or where the insurance indemnity is insufficient to cover the cost of reconstruction the new project costs shall be paid by all the co-owners in the same proportion as their proportionate ownership of the common elements of the condominium project, and if any 1 or more of those composing the minority shall refuse to make such payments, the majority may proceed with the reconstruction at the expense of all the co-owners and the share of the resulting common expense may be assessed against all the co-owners and such assessment for this expense shall have the same priority as provided under § 42-2017.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 458, Pub. L. 88-218, § 22
May 22, 1975, D.C. Law 1-3, § 2(2), 21 DCR 3945
This section is referenced in § 42-2011.
1981 Ed., § 45-1722.
1973 Ed., § 5-922.
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.